cji.verb.lexd
PATTERNS
VerbsWithPrefix
VerbsNoPrefix

PATTERN VerbsWithPrefix
(ClassPrefixes (InfStem|PastStem|FutStem|ImperativStem|ConverbPastStem|ConverbPresentStem)[-no_pref])[^[a-pref,e-pref,ia-pref,i-pref,n-pref,u-pref]]

PATTERN VerbsNoPrefix
(InfStem|PastStem|FutStem|ImperativStem|ConverbPastStem|ConverbPresentStem)[no_pref]

LEXICON ClassPrefixes
<m.sg>:ва[a-pref]  # Bokarev's 1st group
<f.sg>:йа[a-pref]
<h.pl>:ба[a-pref]
<nonh1.sg>:ба[a-pref]
<nonh2.sg>:йа[a-pref]
<nonh3.sg>:йа[a-pref]
<nh.pl>:йа[a-pref]
<m.sg>:ве[e-pref]  # Bokarev's 2nd group
<f.sg>:йе[e-pref]
<h.pl>:бе[e-pref]
<nonh1.sg>:бе[e-pref]
<nonh2.sg>:йе[e-pref]
<nonh3.sg>:йе[e-pref]
<nh.pl>:йе[e-pref]
<m.sg>:ви[ia-pref]  # Bokarev's 3rd group
<f.sg>:йи[ia-pref]
<h.pl>:ба[ia-pref]
<nonh1.sg>:би[ia-pref]
<nonh2.sg>:йи[ia-pref]
<nonh3.sg>:йи[ia-pref]
<nh.pl>:йа[ia-pref]
<m.sg>:ви[i-pref]  # Bokarev's 4th group
<f.sg>:йи[i-pref]
<h.pl>:би[i-pref]
<nonh1.sg>:би[i-pref]
<nonh2.sg>:йи[i-pref]
<nonh3.sg>:йи[i-pref]
<nh.pl>:йи[i-pref]
<m.sg>:ви[n-pref]  # Bokarev's 5th group
<f.sg>:ни[n-pref]
<h.pl>:би[n-pref]
<nonh1.sg>:ба[n-pref]
<nonh2.sg>:ни[n-pref]
<nonh3.sg>:ди[n-pref]
<nh.pl>:да[n-pref]
<m.sg>:ву[u-pref]  # Bokarev's 6th group
<f.sg>:йи[u-pref]
<h.pl>:ба[u-pref]
<nonh1.sg>:бу[u-pref]
<nonh2.sg>:йи[u-pref]
<nonh3.sg>:ву[u-pref]
<nh.pl>:йа[u-pref]

LEXICON InfStem
<verb><inf>:ахъла[no_pref]  # молоть
<verb><inf>:бахла[a-pref]  # броситься

LEXICON PastStem
<verb><pst>:ахъ[no_pref]  # молоть
<verb><pst>:баха[a-pref]  # броситься

LEXICON FutStem
<verb><fut>:ахъида[no_pref]  # молоть
<verb><fut>:бахида[a-pref]  # броситься

LEXICON ImperativStem
<verb><impv>:ахъа[no_pref]  # молоть
<verb><impv>:бахабе[a-pref]  # броситься

LEXICON ConverbPastStem
<cvb><pst>:ахъи[no_pref]  # молоть
<cvb><pst>:баха[a-pref]  # броситься

LEXICON ConverbPresentStem
<cvb><prs>:ахъидахъ[no_pref]  # молоть
<cvb><prs>:бахидахъ[a-pref]  # броситься
